New York, session 2025-2026, S8945.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding 2 a new section 607-m to read as follows: 3 § 607-m. Disabilities of probation officers in certain cases. 1. 4 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local law or 5 administrative code to the contrary, but except for the purposes of the 6 workers' compensation law and the labor law, any condition of impairment 7 of health caused by diseases of the heart, resulting in total or partial 8 disability or death to a person performing the duties of a probation 9 officer, supervising probation officer or probation officer trainee the 10 department of probation in a city with a population of one million or 11 more, who successfully passed a physical examination on entry into such 12 service or subsequent thereto, which examination failed to reveal any 13 evidence of such condition, shall be presumptive evidence that it was 14 incurred in the performance and discharge of duty, unless the contrary 15 be proved by competent evidence. 16 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a probation officer, 17 supervising probation officer or probation officer trainee of a depart- 18 ment of probation in a city with a population of one million or more 19 retiring pursuant to the provisions of subdivision one of this section 20 shall receive a pension equal to three-fourths of such member's final 21 average salary. 22 § 2. All past service costs associated with implementing the 23 provisions of this act shall be borne by the city of New York. 24 § 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, none of the 25 provisions of this act shall be subject to the appropriation requirement 26 of section 25 of the retirement and social security law. 27 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07116-04-6 S. 8945 2 FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: SUMMARY: This proposed legislation would provide to NYCERS Tier 4 and Tier 6 Probation Officers a rebuttable statutory presumption that a qualifying disability or death related to heart disease was incurred in the performance of duty and provide a performance of duty disability retirement benefit equal to 75% of Final Average Salary or applicable accidental death benefit. ILLUSTRATION - INCREASE (DECREASE) IN EMPLOYER CONTRIBUTIONS by Fiscal Year for the first 25 years ($ in Thousands) One Incident One Incident Per Year Year Disability Death Disability Death 2027 43 33 43 33 2028 43 33 88 66 2029 43 33 134 101 2030 43 33 181 137 2031 43 33 230 174 2032 43 33 281 212 2033 43 33 332 251 2034 43 33 386 291 2035 43 33 441 333 2036 43 33 497 375 2037 43 33 556 419 2038 43 33 616 465 2039 43 33 677 511 2040 43 33 741 560 2041 0 0 763 576 2042 0 0 786 594 2043 0 0 810 611 2044 0 0 834 630 2045 0 0 859 649 2046 0 0 885 668 2047 0 0 912 688 2048 0 0 939 709 2049 0 0 967 730 2050 0 0 996 752 2051 0 0 1,026 774 Employer contribution impact beyond Fiscal Year 2051 is not shown. The potential increases in employer contributions will be allocated to New York City. PRESENT VALUE OF BENEFITS: The Present Value of Benefits is the discounted expected value of benefits paid to current members if all assumptions are met, including future service accrual and pay increases. Future new hires are not included in this present value. INITIAL INCREASE (DECREASE) IN ACTUARIAL PRESENT VALUES as of June 30, 2025 ($ in Thousands) Present Value (PV) Per Disability Per Death (1) PV of Employer Contributions: 367 277 (2) PV of Employee Contributions: (15) 0 Total PV of Benefits (1) + (2): 352 277 UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY (UAL): Actuarial Accrued Liabilities are the portion of the Present Value of Benefits allocated to past service. Changes in UAL per incident would be recognized as ongoing gain/loss. S. 8945 3 AMORTIZATION OF UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY Recognized as Ongoing Gain/Loss Per Disability Per Death Increase (Decrease) in UAL: 367 K 277 K Number of Payments: 14 14 Amortization Payment: 43 K 33 K CENSUS DATA: The number of members who will benefit in the future from this proposed legislation is unknown. The estimates presented herein are based on preliminary census data collected as of June 30, 2025. The census data for the potentially impacted population used to develop the average costs is summarized below. NYCERS Active Members - Number Count: 555 - Average Age: 46.9 - Average Service: 14.2 - Average Salary: 83,400 IMPACT ON MEMBER BENEFITS: Currently, active Tier 4 or Tier 6 members of NYCERS who are employed as Probation Officers and become disabled due to heart disease would generally be eligible for an applicable ordinary disability retirement after attaining 10 years of service. The disabili- ty benefit is generally a lifetime payment equal to the greatest of 1/3 of Final Average Salary (FAS), 1/60th of FAS times service, or the service retirement benefit, if eligible. Under the proposed legislation, the performance of duty disability benefit for Tier 4 or Tier 6 Probation Officer members who are disabled from heart disease would be equal to 75% of FAS without an offset for Workers' Compensation. The ordinary death benefit for NYCERS Probation Officers is a lump sum payment generally equal to three times the member's salary, plus a refund of member contributions. Under the proposed legislation, the performance of duty death benefit would generally be equal to a lifetime benefit of 50% of a member's wages earned during their last year of service, payable to certain beneficiaries. ASSUMPTIONS AND METHODS: The estimates presented herein have been calculated based on the Revised 2021 Actuarial Assumptions and Methods of the impacted retirement systems. The number of members who will benefit from this proposed legislation is unknown. The cost of this proposed legislation could vary greatly depending on the number of future members who benefit and on their length of service, age, and salary history. In particular, the increase would be greater for a member who is not yet eligible for an ordinary disability benefit when disabled. The estimated financial impact for disabled members has been calcu- lated assuming 50% would have retired under the current ordinary disa- bility benefit, and 50% would have continued working if the proposed legislation were not passed. RISK AND UNCERTAINTY: The costs presented in this Fiscal Note depend highly on the actuarial assumptions, methods, and models used, demo- graphics of the impacted population, and other factors such as invest- ment, contribution, and other risks. If actual experience deviates from actuarial assumptions, the actual costs could differ from those presented herein. Quantifying these risks is beyond the scope of this Fiscal Note. S. 8945 4 This Fiscal Note is intended to measure pension-related impacts and does not include other potential costs (e.g., administrative and Other Postemployment Benefits). This Fiscal Note does not reflect any chapter laws that may have been enacted during the current legislative session. STATEMENT OF ACTUARIAL OPINION: Marek Tyszkiewicz and Gregory Zelikov- sky are members of the Society of Actuaries and the American Academy of Actuaries. We are members of NYCERS, but do not believe it impairs our objectivity, and we meet the Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to render the actuarial opinion contained herein. To the best of our knowledge, the results contained herein have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles and procedures and with the Actuarial Standards of Practice issued by the Actuarial Standards Board. FISCAL NOTE IDENTIFICATION: This Fiscal Note 2026-01 dated January 15, 2026 was prepared by the Chief Actuary for the New York City Retirement Systems and Pension Funds and is intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session.